Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1741.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SPECIAL LAW; CITY OF ST. LOUIS PARK.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 340A.101, subdivision 25; 340A.401; or 340A.410, subdivision 7, or any other law or ordinance to the contrary, the city of St. Louis Park may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license to a licensee serving as an anchor tenant for a food hall located in the area known as the West End. The license may allow service and consumption anywhere within the licensee establishment, and anywhere within the larger food hall, provided that the larger premises is specified in the on-sale license. Multiple independent food vendors will be able to utilize a common seating area under the control of the liquor license holder to allow the public to purchase and consume food from third parties while also consuming licensed beverages sold by the license holder. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the St. Louis Park City Council and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end